Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 8. Trails, Footpaths, and Campsites.

Administrative Code. —

For trails and footpaths grant program, see 11 AAC 15.

Collateral references. —

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares, and Playgrounds, §§ 20, 21.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 260, 262.

Sec. 41.21.850.
Wilderness trails and campsites.

There is established in the state a system of wilderness trails and campsites.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1969)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.050. Renumbered as AS 41.20.070 in 1969. Renumbered again in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.852.
Selection.

The department, in consultation with the Departments of Fish and Game and Transportation and Public Facilities, shall designate a system of wilderness trails and campsites throughout the state.
Significant in the selection shall be the scenic, historic, natural, or cultural qualities of the areas through which the trails may pass.
The department may acquire the trail sites jointly selected by grant, gift, purchase, lease, dedication, or prescription and hold them in the name of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1969; am E.O. No. 39, § 11 (1977))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.060. Renumbered as AS 41.20.080 in 1969. Renumbered again in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.854.
Uniform marker.

The commissioner shall establish a uniform marker for the wilderness trails system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1969)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.070. Renumbered as AS 41.20.090 in 1969. Renumbered again in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.856.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations concerning the use, management, development, and administration of the trails.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1969)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.080. Renumbered as AS 41.20.100 in 1969. Renumbered again in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.858.
Campsites; work by prisoners.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may construct and maintain campsites throughout the wilderness trails system. Campsites may include any type of shelter or camp facility considered necessary and desirable for the benefit and convenience of travelers.

As an aid to the construction and maintenance of trails and campsites under (a) of this section, the commissioner of corrections is authorized to establish a program that would allow prisoners to volunteer for work on the trails and campsites. The commissioner is authorized to grant remuneration for the work, either in money or reduction of sentence, which the commissioner considers sufficient.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1969; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am E.O. No. 55, § 36 (1984))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.090. Renumbered as AS 41.20.110 in 1969. Renumbered again in 1983.

Cross references. —

For employment and compensation of prisoners, see AS

33.30.191

and

33.30.201

.

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 41.21.860.
Federal financial assistance.

The commissioner is authorized to consider the feasibility of any form of financial assistance available to the state for the planning, acquisition, or development of trails under 16 U.S.C. 460d, 460l-4 to 460l-11 and 23 U.S.C. 120 (note) (P.L. 88-578, Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965).

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1969)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.100. Renumbered as AS 41.20.120 in 1969. Renumbered again in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.864.
Grants for the establishment of trails and footpaths.

Within the limits of available appropriations, a city or borough of any class is entitled to state grants for the purpose of acquiring land or rights-of-way over land and establishing and maintaining trails and footpaths on that land or those rights-of-way.

Within the limits of available appropriations, the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities is entitled to state grants for the establishment and maintenance of footpaths and trails along certain designated existing highways or when a highway, road or street is being constructed, reconstructed or relocated after June 7, 1972.

Before a grant is awarded under this section, application shall be submitted to the commissioner of natural resources, accompanied by a comprehensive plan for the establishment of trails and paths. The plan may provide for ski trails, dog sled trails, motorized vehicle trails, bicycle paths, bridle paths, footpaths and other trails and paths, and designate separate and incompatible uses of these trails and paths.

Upon approval of the plan, funds shall be utilized and disbursed to cities and boroughs and to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities according to regulations adopted by the commissioner of natural resources.

Before the distribution of funds by the commissioner, consideration shall be given to the extent of funding available under other federal, local and state aid programs.

Nothing in AS

41.21.864

—

41.21.872

prohibits a city or borough for which a grant is authorized from entering into an agreement with the Department of Natural Resources for the establishment and maintenance of trails and footpaths outside cities and boroughs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.355. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For jurisdiction and procedure, see 11 AAC 15, art. 1.

Sec. 41.21.866.
Paths and trails along highways.

The commissioner of transportation and public facilities shall administer the plan and program providing for the establishment and maintenance of footpaths, bridle paths, bicycle paths, ski trails, dog sled trails, motorized vehicle trails, and other paths and trails along certain designated existing highways, or when a highway, road, or street is being constructed, reconstructed, or relocated after June 7, 1972. Trails established under an approved plan submitted by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may be used for those types of uses written into the plan.
A uniform system of marking the paths and trails established under this section shall be established by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 75 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.360. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.868.
Authorization of funds.

An amount of not less than three-eighths of one percent nor more than one percent of the total yearly state and federal matching sum combined, under the federal-aid highways program (23 U.S.C.), shall be appropriated annually from the general fund to the department for the purposes of providing grants to eligible cities and boroughs for trails, footpaths, and shelter construction and maintenance in appropriate areas, including but not limited to existing park and recreation areas and for the purpose of providing grants to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for developing the program specified in AS

41.21.864(b)

and

41.21.866

.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, the sums appropriated under this section shall continue to be available for expenditure by the departments or by eligible cities and boroughs for a period of three years after the close of the fiscal year for which the sums are authorized, unless they are obligated for expenditure, in which case they shall remain available until spent. Any amounts not obligated remaining unexpended at the end of the three-year period lapse.

The amount expended by a city or borough under AS

41.21.864

(a) or by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS

41.21.864

(b) and

41.21.866

, may not in any one fiscal year be less than 10 percent of the total amount of the funds it receives in that year for the purposes authorized in AS 41.21.864 —

41.21.872

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.365. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.870.
Use and marking of trails and footpaths.

Trails established under AS

41.21.864(a)

may be used for more than one type of transportation, motorized or nonmotorized, as considered appropriate by the commissioner.
Except along highways within the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, the department shall provide a uniform system of marking trails and footpaths.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.370. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.872.
Reports.

Cities and boroughs receiving grants under AS

41.21.864

—

41.21.872

shall submit to the commissioner complete reports covering their expenditures relating to the establishment of trails and footpaths.
Reports shall be submitted annually on projects extending over 12 months. Reports on shorter projects shall be submitted at the completion of the project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.375. Renumbered in 1983.